Tennessee, session 114, HB1100.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 53-1-102(14), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) "Drug" also means food that contains an antibiotic;
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 53-1-103(a), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) The manufacture, sale, or delivery, holding, or offering for sale of any food
that contains an antibiotic, or a vaccine or vaccine material, unless the food labeling
contains a conspicuous notification of the presence of the antibiotic, vaccine, or vaccine
material in the food.
SECTION 3. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance
is held invalid, then the invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act that
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to that end, the provisions of
this act are severable.
SECTION 4. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1100
003142
- 1 -